Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1844.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3203 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 3203. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Abortion drug." A medicine, drug or other substance, or combination thereof, used to terminate the clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman.* * *"Catch kit." A collection container designed to catch and hold medical waste or infectious waste, including a container 123456789101112131415161718 used for collecting a sample for testing."Chemical abortion." An abortion through the use of an abortion drug.* * *"Medical waste bag." A receptacle made to contain medical or biohazardous waste.* * *Section 2. Section 3204(c) of Title 18 is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 3204. Medical consultation and judgment.* * *(b.1) Requirements for chemical abortion.--(1) A physician may not knowingly provide or attempt to provide a chemical abortion unless the physician:(i) Physically examines the woman in person and not through the use of virtual technology.(ii) Is physically present with the woman at a hospital or ambulatory surgical treatment center when the woman ingests the first abortion drug or drugs necessary for a chemical abortion.(iii) Schedules a follow-up visit for the woman that occurs not later than seven days after the administration or use of the first abortion drug or drugs in order to assess the woman's condition.(iv) Provides a catch kit and medical waste bag to the woman to be used for disposal of fetal remains, including instructions for the woman on how to use the catch kit and to bring the catch kit and medical waste bag to the physician or a qualified person designated by the physician for proper disposal and for required 20250HB1844PN2280 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 pathological examinations, if applicable, under section 3214(c) (relating to reporting).(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to action by a physician or other health care practitioner to treat a diagnosed ectopic pregnancy or miscarriage.(b.2) Medical waste bags.--A medical waste bag provided to a woman seeking a chemical abortion shall:(1) Contain warning labels that state "biohazard" and the universal biological hazard symbol.(2) Be a color to signify that it contains biohazardous waste with lettering and symbols in a contrasting color.(c) Factors.--In determining in accordance with subsection (a) [or], (b) or (b.1) whether an abortion is necessary, a physician's best clinical judgment may be exercised in the light of all factors (physical, emotional, psychological, familial and the woman's age) relevant to the well-being of the woman. No abortion which is sought solely because of the sex of the unborn child shall be deemed a necessary abortion.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1844PN2280 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920